Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2213.03
PAREA program, defined.

PAREA program means a practical applications of real estate appraisal program approved by the Appraiser Qualifications Board as prescribed by rules and regulations of the Real Property Appraiser Board.

Laws 2022, LB707, § 51.